en: Handkerchiefs
xx: Handkerchiefs
cs: Kapesníčky do saka
da: Lommetørklæder
de: Einstecktücher
es: Pañuelos de bolsillo
fr: Pochettes de costume, Mouchoir en tissu
it: Fazzoletti taschino
ja: ハンカチ
nl: Pochetten
no: Lommetørkler
pl: Chusteczki
pt: Lenços de bolso
ru: Нагрудные платки
sv: Näsdukar
tr: Mendiller

en: Hats
xx: Hats
cs: Klobouky
da: Hatte
de: Hüte
es: Sombreros
fr: Chapeaux, Chapeau
it: Cappelli
ja: 帽子
nl: Hoeden
no: Hatter
pl: Czapki
pt: Chapéus
ru: Шляпы
sv: Hattar
tr: Şapkalar

en: Beanies
xx: Beanies
fr: Bonnets, Bonnet

en: Berets
xx: Berets
fr: Bérets, Béret

en: Caps
xx: Caps
fr: Casquettes, Casquette

en: Toques
xx: Toques
fr: Toques, Toque

en: Headwear
xx: Headwear
cs: Pokrývky hlavy
da: Hovedbeklædning
de: Kopfbekleidung & -tücher
es: Accesorios para la cabeza
fr: Articles de chapellerie et couvre-chefs, Couvre-chefs, Couvre-chef
it: Accessori capelli e fazzoletti
ja: ヘッドアクセサリー
nl: Hoofdmode
no: Hodeplagg
pl: Nakrycia głowy
pt: Acessórios para a cabeça
ru: Головные уборы и платки
sv: Huvudbonader
tr: Başlıklar

en: Fascinators
xx: Fascinators
cs: Ozdobné pokrývky hlavy
da: Fascinators
de: Fascinators
es: Tocados
fr: Petits chapeaux et bibis
it: Fascinator
ja: ヘッドピース
nl: Hoofddoeken
no: Hodetørkler
pl: Toczki
pt: Fascinators
ru: Вуалетки
sv: Huvudsjalar
tr: Eşarplar

en: Headdresses
xx: Headdresses
cs: Ozdoby hlavy
da: Hovedpynt
de: Kopfschmuck
es: Tocados para mujeres
fr: Coiffes
it: Copricapi
ja: ヘッド ドレス
nl: Hoofdtooien
no: Hodepynt
pl: Przybranie głowy
pt: Adornos para a cabeça
ru: Головные уборы
sv: Huvuddukar
tr: Süslü Başlıklar

en: Turbans
xx: Turbans
cs: Turbany
da: Turbaner
de: Turbane
es: Turbantes
fr: Turbans
it: Turbanti
ja: ターバン
nl: Tulbanden
no: Turbaner
pl: Turbany
pt: Turbantes
ru: Тюрбаны
sv: Turbaner
tr: Türbanlar

en: Leg Warmers
xx: Leg Warmers
cs: Návleky na nohy
da: Benvarmere
de: Beinstulpen
es: Calientapiernas
fr: Jambières
it: Scaldamuscoli
ja: レッグウォーマー
nl: Beenwarmers
no: Leggvarmere
pl: Ocieplacze na nogi
pt: Polainas
ru: Теплые изделия для ног
sv: Benvärmare
tr: Bacak Tozlukları

en: Leis
xx: Leis
cs: Havajské věnce
da: Blomsterkranse
de: Leis
es: Collar de flores
fr: Colliers de fleurs
it: Collane di fiori polinesiane
ja: レイ
nl: Bloemenkettingen
no: Blomsterkranser
pl: Lei
pt: Leis
ru: Леи
sv: Leikransar
tr: Çiçek Kolyeleri

en: Maternity Belts & Support Bands
xx: Maternity Belts & Support Bands
cs: Těhotenské a podpůrné pásy
da: Støttebånd og mavebælter i forbindelse med graviditet
de: Schwangerschaftsgürtel & Bauchstützen
es: Fajas de embarazo y cinturones de maternidad
fr: Ceintures et bandeaux de grossesse
it: Fasce di sostegno e cinture premaman
ja: マタニティベルト・サポートバンド
nl: Buik- en steunbanden voor zwangerschap
no: Graviditetsbelter og støttebånd
pl: Pasy ciążowe
pt: Cintos de maternidade e faixas de apoio
ru: Бандажи для беременных и поясничные корсеты
sv: Gravidbälten och stödbälten
tr: Hamile Kemerleri ve Destek Bantları

en: Neck Gaiters
xx: Neck Gaiters
cs: Návleky na krk
da: Halsedisser
de: Halswärmer
es: Cuellos polares
fr: Cache-col
it: Scaldacollo
ja: ネックウォーマー
nl: Nekwarmers
no: Halsvarmere
pl: Kominy na szyję
pt: Polaina de pescoço
ru: Шарфы-трубы
sv: Nackvärmare
tr: Boyun Tozlukları

en: Neckties
xx: Neckties
cs: Kravaty
da: Tørklæder og slips
de: Krawatten
es: Corbatas y pajaritas
fr: Cravates
it: Cravatte e cravattini
ja: ネクタイ
nl: Dassen
no: Slips og sløyfer
pl: Krawaty i muszki
pt: Gravatas
ru: Галстуки и бабочки
sv: Slipsar och flugor
tr: Boyun Bağları

en: Pinback Buttons
xx: Pinback Buttons
cs: Odznaky
da: Badgeknapper
de: Ansteckbuttons
es: Chapas
fr: Badges
it: Spillette
ja: 缶バッジ
nl: Buttons
no: Nåler og merker
pl: Przypinki
pt: Botons com pino
ru: Значки
sv: Pins
tr: Arkası İğneli Düğmeler

en: Sashes
xx: Sashes
cs: Šerpy
da: Skærf
de: Schärpen
es: Bandas
fr: Écharpes, Écharpe, Echarpes, Echarpe
it: Fasce
ja: サッシュ
nl: Sjerpen
no: Bånd
pl: Szarfy
pt: Faixas
ru: Наградные ленты
sv: Skärp
tr: Fularlar

en: Scarves & Shawls
xx: Scarves & Shawls
cs: Šátky a šály
da: Tørklæder og sjaler
de: Schals & Halstücher
es: Bufandas y chales
fr: Écharpes\, foulards et châles
it: Sciarpe e scialli
ja: スカーフ・ショール
nl: Sjaals
no: Skjerf og sjal
pl: Szaliki i szale
pt: Cachecóis e xales
ru: Шарфы и шали
sv: Halsdukar och sjalar
tr: Atkı ve Şallar

en: Scarves
xx: Scarves
cs: Šály
da: Halstørklæder
de: Schals
es: Bufandas
fr: Foulards, Foulard
it: Sciarpe
ja: スカーフ
nl: Sjaal
no: Skjerf
pl: Szale
pt: Cachecóis
ru: Шарфы
sv: Halsdukar
tr: Atkılar

en: Shawls
xx: Shawls
cs: Velké šátky
da: Sjaler
de: Halstücher
es: Chales
fr: Châles
it: Scialli
ja: ショール
nl: Shawl
no: Sjal
pl: Chusty
pt: Xales
ru: Шали
sv: Sjalar
tr: Şallar